Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Chapter 9. County Port Authority or Development Commission
§ 59-9-37.
Issuance of bonds and interim certificates.

The board of supervisors of any county in which a county port authority or county development commission has been created pursuant to this chapter is hereby given authority to issue bonds or other obligations of such county in an amount not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the assessed valuation of such county to provide funds for any purpose or purposes set out in this chapter. Such bonds may be issued at one (1) time or from time to time in such amount or amounts, shall bear such date or dates, shall be of such denomination or denominations, shall be payable at such place or places, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall mature in such amount or amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding twenty (20) years from the date thereof, with or without option of prior payment, and shall be executed in such manner, all as may be determined by the said board of supervisors. The resolution or order adopted by the board of supervisors authorizing said bonds may pledge the sources of revenue authorized under the statutes to pay the principal thereof and interest thereon, and all bonds issued under the one (1) resolution or order may be equally secured and entitled to be paid. In event, however, such board of supervisors elects to delay actual delivery or sale of any part of the bonds so authorized, either until the proceeds thereof are needed, or upon the happening or occurrence of any event or thing, then and in that event the bonds so authorized and any part thereof shall be secured and be entitled to be paid, both as to principal and interest in accordance with the terms and conditions to be fixed and recited in said resolution or order. In anticipation of the issuance of the definitive bonds authorized by this chapter, any such county may issue interim certificates. Such interim certificates shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions or provisions, bear such date or dates, and evidence such agreement or agreements relating to their discharge by payment or by the delivery of the definitive bonds, as such county, by resolution of its governing body, may determine. Whenever any county shall have issued bonds under this section or Section 59-9-41, a portion of which remains outstanding and unpaid, and the governing authority of such county desires to refund all or any portion of such bonds or to issue additional bonds under this section or Section 59-9-41, for the purpose herein or therein authorized and to consolidate all or any portion of such bonded indebtedness, such governing authority, by resolution or resolutions, may at any time authorize and direct the issuance of bonds. The proceeds of such new bonds shall be used to pay or provide for the payment of, at or prior to maturity, any outstanding and unpaid bonds (including any unpaid accrued interest thereon), and any balance of such proceeds not so utilized shall be used and expended for the purposes authorized by this chapter. In the event that such outstanding bonds, by the terms thereof, are redeemable prior to maturity at the option of such county, then such option of redemption may be exercised in the manner provided in such bonds. Such new bonds shall be issued in like manner and like incidence and shall be payable from the same source or sources and the payment thereof shall be secured in like manner as provided in this section or Section 59-9-41 provided in the case of the issuance of original bonds under this section or under Section 59-9-41. In lieu of selling such portion of such new bonds as may be required to pay or provide for the payment of such outstanding bonds, such new bonds may be issued and delivered in exchange for and upon surrender and cancellation of a like amount of such outstanding bonds.

In addition and supplemental to the rights, duties and powers now or hereafter conferred by law upon counties having created a county port authority or county development commission, such counties are empowered and authorized to issue general obligation bonds of such counties as hereinabove provided, to acquire, establish, construct, develop, improve and maintain revetments, embankments, groins, sea walls, jetties, moles, breakwaters, gates, locks, dams, water basins, reservoirs, aqueducts, canals, water supply and distribution systems or pipelines and easements necessary thereto; and the acquisition, development and improvement of lands and property for any of such purposes. Such counties are further empowered and authorized to enter into contracts, agreements, assurances, or commitments with the United States of America, or any department or agency thereof, the State of Mississippi, or any department, political subdivision or agency thereof, or any person, firm or corporation relating or in connection with any power or duty authorized, imposed, or conferred upon such county by law, and to cooperate with and assist any public body or agency, or bodies or agencies, having jurisdiction of any waterway, port, harbor, or water development program, and to jointly exercise any or all of such powers as a joint operation with any other county or counties. Any such county or any party entering into any contract with any such county shall be entitled to maintain any action in any court of competent jurisdiction against the county or any other party to said contract to enforce any contractual right arising out of any such contract.

General obligation bonds issued under the provision of this section shall be payable from an ad valorem tax which may be levied without limit as to rate or amount upon all taxable property within the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 14; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 8; Laws, 1962, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 439, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 18; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 33; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 40, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 59-9-39.
Attorney’s fees for issuance of general obligation bonds.

Attorney’s fees for the issuance of any general obligation bonds authorized by the provisions of this chapter shall not exceed for each issue the following schedule:

Up to and including one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), one per cent (1%).

Above one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) and up to and including two million dollars ($2,000,000.00), one half of one per cent (1/2 of 1%).

Above two million dollars ($2,000,000.00), one fourth of one per cent (1/4 of 1%).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 14; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 8; Laws, 1962, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1962).

§ 59-9-41.
Revenue bonds.

In addition to the authority conferred by Section 59-9-37, the board of supervisors of such county is further authorized, in its discretion, to issue revenue bonds of such county to provide funds for any purpose or purposes set out in this chapter or in Section 59-5-31. Such revenue bonds may be issued upon compliance with Section 59-9-51, and shall not be subject to any limitation as to amount, and shall not be included or computed in the statutory limitations of indebtedness of any such county. Such bonds shall bear date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates, provided that the bonds of any issue shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the board of supervisors of such county. Such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from date thereof and extending not more than thirty-five (35) years from date thereof. Such bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of supervisors of such county, and the official seal of the county shall be affixed thereto, attested by the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county. The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of said officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officers herein designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

The revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be payable solely out of the revenues to accrue from the operation of such project development, improvement or utility systems, and the full faith and credit of the county shall not be pledged therefor, nor shall any ad valorem tax be levied therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 14; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 8; Laws, 1962, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 416, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 477, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1985).

§ 59-9-43.
Sale and disposition of proceeds of bonds issued under §§ 59-9-37 and 59-9-41.

The board of supervisors of a county issuing bonds under Sections 59-9-37 and 59-9-41 shall sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of said county, but no such sale (other than revenue bonds) shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. Notice of the sale of any such bonds (other than revenue bonds) shall be published at least one (1) time not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale and shall be published in a newspaper published in and having general circulation within such county.

The proceeds of such bonds shall be paid into a special fund or funds in banks qualified to act as depositories for such county. The proceeds of such bonds shall be solely for the purposes for which they were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, and shall be disbursed upon order of the board of supervisors of such county, with such restriction, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the purpose for which they were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 14; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 8; Laws, 1962, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 416, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 59-9-45.
Negotiability and taxation of bonds issued under §§ 59-3-37 and 59-9-41.

Any bonds, interest coupons, interim certificates or other obligations issued under the provisions of Sections 59-9-37 and 59-9-41 shall have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, provided that it shall not be necessary to file any financing statements or continuation statements to perfect or protect the security of the holders of such bonds or to give notice to third parties of the existence of such security. Such bonds and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 14; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 8; Laws, 1962, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 416, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1976).

§ 59-9-47.
Proceedings for issuance and validation of bonds issued under §§ 59-9-37 and 59-9-41.

Bonds authorized under the authority of Sections 59-9-37 and 59-9-41 may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this chapter. The bonds authorized under the authority of this chapter may, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, be validated in the chancery court of such county in a manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 14; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 8; Laws, 1962, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1962).

§ 59-9-49.
Levy of ad valorem tax for operating fund.

In addition and supplemental to the rights, duties and powers now or hereafter conferred by law upon counties having created a county port authority or county development commission, the board of supervisors of any such county, at the request of the county port authority or the county development commission, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to levy an ad valorem tax, not to exceed two mills on the dollar of assessed valuation of the taxable property of such county, to provide an operating fund for such county port authority or county development commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 14; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 8; Laws, 1962, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1962).

§ 59-9-51.
County-wide election on issuance of bonds under §§ 59-9-37 and 59-9-41.

A county-wide election shall be held to determine whether such bonds, as are provided for in Sections 59-9-37 and 59-9-41, may be issued. Upon the calling of an election, notice of such election shall be signed by the clerk of the board of supervisors and shall be published once a week for at least three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one days prior to the date fixed for such election, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven days prior to such date. If no newspaper is published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one days next preceding such election in three public places in such county. Such election shall be held, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in counties. At such election, all qualified electors of such county may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words “FOR THE BOND ISSUE” and “AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE,” and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition. When the results of the election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of such county and certified by them to the board of supervisors of such county, it shall be the duty of such board of supervisors to determine and adjudicate whether or not a majority of the qualified electors who voted thereon in such election shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, and unless a majority of the qualified electors who voted thereon in such election shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued. Should a majority of the qualified electors who vote thereon in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then the board of supervisors of the county may issue such bonds, either in whole or in part, within two years from the date of such election, or within two years after the final favorable termination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds, as such board shall deem best. However, the board of supervisors, in its discretion may, in lieu of the foregoing provisions, adopt a resolution reciting its intention to issue bonds for the purposes authorized by this chapter, stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued and the date upon which further action will be taken by the board looking toward the issuance of such bonds. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three successive weeks in a newspaper published and of general circulation within such county. The first of such publications shall be made at least twenty-one days prior to the date set forth in said resolution as the date upon which further action will be taken by the board, and the last of such publications shall be made not more than seven days prior to such date. If, prior to the date set forth as aforesaid, there shall be filed with the clerk of such board a petition in writing signed by twenty per cent (20%) of the qualified electors of such county, requesting an election on the question of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued unless authorized by a majority of the qualified electors of such county who vote thereon at an election to be ordered by such board for that purpose. Notice of such election shall be given and such election shall be held and conducted in like manner as provided by law with respect to the submission of other county bond issues in such county. If the proposition so submitted shall fail to receive approval at such election, then no further proceedings for the issuance of such bonds shall be had or taken within a period of six months from and after the date of such election. If, however, no such petition shall be so filed, or if at such election, or subsequent election, such proposition be assented to by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon, then such board of supervisors shall be authorized to proceed with the issuance of such bonds without further election.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-15; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 15; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 9; Laws, 1960, ch. 211, § 2.

§ 59-9-53.
Pledge of county credit and resources for payment of bonds; issuance of revenue bonds.

Such bonds, as are provided for in Section 59-9-37, shall be general obligations of the county, and for the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon, the full faith, credit and resources of such county shall be and are hereby irrevocably pledged, and it shall be the mandatory duty of the board of supervisors of such county annually to levy upon all taxable property within such county an ad valorem tax sufficient to provide for the payment of such bonds as they mature and the interest thereon as it accrues, and the proceeds of such tax levy shall be used for no other purpose. In its discretion, such board of supervisors may also pledge for the payment of such bonds and interest thereon the revenues from facilities operated by the county port authority or county development commission, and any surplus revenues accruing to such county under and by virtue of Sections 65-33-45 and 65-33-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, and not theretofore pledged or hypothecated, and any other surplus funds available to such county from any other source, and not theretofore pledged or hypothecated. The board of supervisors of such county is further authorized, in its discretion, to issue revenue bonds of such county to provide funds for any purpose or purposes set out in this chapter, in the same manner as provided in Section 59-9-57 for the issuance of joint county and municipal revenue bonds, except that the board of supervisors of such county shall be authorized to issue such revenue bonds without the necessity of joint or concurrent action by any municipality, or the necessity of a separate election in such municipality, and such revenue bonds may be secured, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, as provided in the preceding sentence hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-16; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 16; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 10.

§ 59-9-55.
Investment of proceeds of bonds.

Any county which has heretofore issued bonds pursuant to this chapter, is hereby authorized to invest the proceeds of such bonds not needed for immediate use in bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the United States, but such investments shall not be made except upon the approval of the development commission or port authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-16.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 394, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 59-9-57.
Joint development, maintenance, operation, etc., of ports by county port authority or commission and municipality; joint bond issue.

The board of supervisors, acting through its county port authority or county development commission, and the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located, acting through its port commission, jointly may negotiate a contract or contracts for the development, construction, repair, and maintenance and operation of seaports, wharves, piers, docks, ways, elevators, compresses, warehouses, roadways and water, air and rail terminals and other structures, facilities and lands needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce or any other property at the port of entry under the joint jurisdiction of such county port authority or county development commission and such port commission. Such county and municipality, acting through the board of supervisors of such county, and the governing authorities of such municipality are authorized to jointly issue bonds or other obligations to provide funds for such joint undertakings. Such bonds shall be issued as provided in Sections 59-9-37 through 59-9-51, but shall be jointly issued by the board of supervisors of such county and by the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located, acting concurrently. Such bonds shall be denominated as port improvement bonds of the county and municipality issuing the same. Unless three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors of such county who voted in an election to be held for that purpose shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds and three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors of the municipality in which the port of entry is located who voted in an election held for that purpose shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued. Electors of such county who vote in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds and should three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors of the municipality in which the port of entry is located who vote in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then the board of supervisors of such county and the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located may issue such bonds, either in whole or part, within three years after the date of such election or within three years after the termination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds, as such board of supervisors and such governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located jointly shall deem best. For the payment of such bonds and interest thereon, the board of supervisors of such county and the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located, may each pledge the two-mill ad valorem tax authorized by Section 59-9-59, or such part thereof as may be required for the payment of such bonds and interest thereon. Such county and municipality, acting jointly, may also pledge for the payment of such bonds and interest thereon, the revenues from all or any of the facilities operated or to be operated jointly by the county port authority or county development commission and port commission and any revenues accruing to such county and municipality under and by virtue of Sections 59-7-1 or 59-7-303, and not theretofore pledged or hypothecated, and any such county may also pledge any surplus funds accruing by virtue of Sections 65-33-45 or 65-33-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, and not theretofore pledged or hypothecated, and any other surplus funds available to such county or municipality from any other source. Such bonds shall not be computed as being within any statutory limitation on the issuance of municipal or county bonds, but the two-mill ad valorem tax, or such part thereof as may be necessary for the payment of such bonds and interest thereon, as well as any revenues accruing to such county and municipality under and by virtue of Sections 59-7-1 or 59-7-303, and any surplus accruing to such county under Sections 65-33-45 or 65-33-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, and not theretofore pledged or hypothecated, shall be irrevocably pledged to the payment of such bonds and interest. Any bonds, or other obligations issued pursuant to this section shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all the purposes of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code. Whenever any county and municipality, acting jointly, shall have issued bonds hereunder, a portion of which remain outstanding and unpaid, and the governing authorities of such county and municipality, acting jointly, desire to issue additional bonds hereunder for the purposes herein authorized and desire to consolidate all such bonded indebtedness, such governing authorities, by resolution or resolutions, may at any time authorize and direct the issuance of bonds. The proceeds of such new bonds shall be used to take up, pay and redeem all of such outstanding and unpaid bonds at their par value, and the balance of such proceeds shall be used and expended for the purposes authorized by this section. In the event that such outstanding bonds, by the terms thereof, shall be redeemable prior to maturity at the option of such county and municipality, acting jointly, then such option of redemption shall be exercised in the manner provided in such bonds, or in the event that such outstanding bonds, by the terms thereof, be not so redeemable prior to maturity, then the consent of the holder or holders thereof shall first be had and obtained to the end that, in either of said events, the redemption of such outstanding bonds may be accomplished concurrently with the issuance of such new bonds. Such new bonds shall be issued in like manner and like incidence and shall be payable from the same source or sources and the payment thereof shall be secured in like manner as herein provided in the case of the issuance of original bonds hereunder. In lieu of selling such portion of such new bonds as may be required to provide for the redemption of such outstanding bonds, such new bonds may be issued and delivered in exchange for and upon surrender and cancellation of a like amount of such outstanding bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-17; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 17; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 11.

§ 59-9-59.
Joint bond issue; tax levy; collection and disposition of taxes.

Where the issuance of bonds has been authorized as provided by Section 59-9-57, and so long as any of such bonds shall be outstanding the board of supervisors of such county, and the governing authorities of the municipality wherein the port of entry is located in such county, are authorized to levy and collect an ad valorem tax not to exceed two mills, for the joint development, construction, maintenance, repair, or operation of harbor and port facilities authorized by this chapter, which levy shall be collected by the tax collector of such county and the tax collector of the municipality, and shall be deposited into a fund to be designated “the county port fund” and into “the municipal port fund”, respectively, and which sums shall be disbursed on the requisition of the county port authority, or the port commission of the municipality, as the case may be, and which funds may also be pledged and used for the payment of bonds issued hereunder.

All taxes collected for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds issued hereunder, shall be credited to a special fund in the county and municipal treasuries of such county and municipality and to be known and designated as the “port bonds interest and sinking fund”, and all sums credited to said fund shall be used to pay such bonds as they mature and the interest thereon as it accrues and for no other purpose. It shall be the mandatory duty of such board of supervisors and governing authorities of the municipality to transfer funds from said port funds to the port bonds interest and sinking fund in amounts sufficient to pay maturing principal and accruing interest on bonds issued hereunder. To the extent that funds are thus made available for the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon, the special tax levy herein provided for may be correspondingly reduced.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-18; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 18.

§ 59-9-61.
Joint bond issue; control of facilities; collection and disposition of revenues.

All improvements and facilities constructed pursuant to the joint issuance of bonds by any county and municipality under the authority of Sections 59-9-57 and 59-9-59, shall be maintained and operated under the control of the county port authority and of the port commission. The county port authority and port commission shall, subject to and in accordance with any agreement or agreements as may be made by any such county and municipality with the purchaser or purchasers of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, prescribe, levy, and collect all rents, fees, tolls, revenues and other charges in connection with the use and occupancy of the aforesaid improvements and facilities, and shall pay over all net revenues derived from the operation of such improvements and facilities to any trustee, or successor thereto, established as hereinafter in this chapter provided. Net revenues shall be deemed to be such as may be defined in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such county and municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to the aforesaid sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-19; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 19.

§ 59-9-63.
Joint bond issue; powers and duties of counties and municipalities.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or other obligations by any county and municipality jointly pursuant to this chapter, such county and municipality, acting jointly, shall have the powers and duties conferred by Sections 59-7-321 and 59-7-323, and all such powers and duties shall apply to and shall be exercised jointly by such county and municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-20; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 20.

§ 59-9-65.
Issuance of bonds and obligations for dredging channels and industrial site preparation.

In addition to authority to issue bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter, the board of supervisors of any county which has a plan approved by the Mississippi Board of Economic Development for the planned development of any port, harbor or waterway, may, with the approval of the Mississippi Board of Economic Development, issue general obligation bonds of such county in the maximum principal amount of two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) to provide funds for the dredging of channel and harbor and preparation of site for the construction or acquisition of ships, vessels, shipyards, shipbuilding facilities, machinery and equipment, dredges, floating drydocks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats, or any other facilities required or incidental to the construction, outfitting, drydocking or repair of ships or vessels.

Such bonds may be issued at one (1) time or from time to time, in such amount or amounts, shall bear such date or dates, shall be of such denomination or denominations, shall be payable at such place or places, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall mature in such amount or amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding twenty (20) years from the date thereof, with or without option of prior payment, and shall be executed in such manner, all as may be determined by the said board of supervisors. No interest payment due on any bond shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and supplemental coupons will not be permitted; the difference between the highest rate of interest specified for any bond issue shall not exceed the lowest rate of interest specified for the same bond issue by more than one and one-fourth percent (1-1/4%). Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in a multiple of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) and a zero rate of interest cannot be named. Such bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of supervisors of such county, and the official seal of the county shall be affixed thereto, attested by the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county. The interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of said officer. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officers herein designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

Before issuing such bonds, the board of supervisors of such county shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to issue such bonds, stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued and the date upon which further action will be taken by the board looking toward the issuance of such bonds. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) successive weeks in a newspaper published and of general circulation within such county. The first of such publications shall be made at least twenty-one (21) days prior to the date set forth in said resolution as the date upon which further action will be taken by the board, and the last of such publications shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If, prior to the date set forth as aforesaid, there shall be filed with the clerk of such board a petition in writing signed by twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of such county, requesting an election on the question of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued unless authorized by a majority of the qualified electors of such county who vote thereon at an election to be ordered by such board for that purpose. Notice of such election shall be given and such election shall be held and conducted in like manner as provided by law with respect to the submission of other county bond issues in the county. If, however, no such petition shall be so filed, or if at such election, or subsequent election, such proposition be assented to by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon, then such board of supervisors shall be authorized to proceed with the issuance of such bonds without further election.

The board of supervisors of such county shall sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of said county, but in no case to exceed the rate of interest hereinabove provided, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. Notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one (1) time not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale and shall be published in a newspaper published in and having general circulation within the county.

The resolution or order adopted by the board of supervisors authorizing the issuance of said bonds shall pledge the sources of revenues authorized under the statutes to pay the principal thereof and interest thereon; and all bonds issued under one (1) resolution or order may be equally secured and entitled to be paid. In addition to such pledge, such bonds shall be payable from an ad valorem tax which may be levied without limit as to rate or amount upon all taxable property within the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 23; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 20; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 34; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 41, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).